Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 2. Disclosure

§ 101.
Borrower’s notice.

A demand note shall contain on its face the following notice in a size equal to at least 10-point bold type:

NOTICE TO BORROWER: THIS IS A DEMAND NOTE AND SO MAY BE COLLECTED BY THE LENDER AT ANY TIME.
A NEW NOTE MUTUALLY AGREED UPON AND SUBSEQUENTLY ISSUED MAY CARRY A HIGHER OR LOWER RATE OF INTEREST.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 106

, § 3.

§ 102.
Co-signer’s notice.

If a lender requires the signature of an obligor jointly and severally the instrument evidencing the obligation shall contain on its face the following notice, conspicuously placed, in a size equal to at least 10-point bold type:

NOTICE TO CO-SIGNER: YOUR SIGNATURE ON THIS NOTE MEANS THAT YOU ARE EQUALLY LIABLE FOR REPAYMENT OF THIS LOAN. IF THE BORROWER DOES NOT PAY, THE LENDER HAS A LEGAL RIGHT TO COLLECT FROM YOU.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 106

, § 3.

§ 103.
Residential real estate loans.

For any fixed-rate loan, secured by a lien against real estate, used or to be used by the borrower as a residence, the rate of interest and other terms of the loan shall be for the duration of the loan at no more than the rate and terms established in the commitment letter for the loan by the lender, whether or not conditioned on future actions or events, and not the date of execution or closing of the transaction, unless specifically disclosed to and agreed to by the borrower on the date the commitment letter issues. The provisions of section 50 of this title shall apply to any violation of this section.

For any variable-rate loan, secured by a lien against real estate used or to be used by the borrower as a residence, the lender shall disclose any introductory discount or similar reduction from the index or other measure fixing the rate or other terms of the loan at the time the loan commitment letter issues. Any subsequent adjustment above the initial amount discounted, not disclosed as provided in this subsection, shall have no legal force and effect.

The Commissioner of Financial Regulation may adopt rules specifying the form, content, and timing of commitment letters required by this section. The Commissioner may order any person to make restitution to any person injured as a result of a violation of this subchapter and may impose an administrative penalty of up to $1,000.00 for a violation of this subchapter. The Commissioner may order any person to cease violating this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1997, No. 98

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 16, 1998;

2015, No. 23

, § 88.

§ 104.
High rate loans.

The Commissioner may adopt disclosure rules for loans secured by a first lien on residential real estate in which the borrower is expected to be charged in excess of four points or interest in excess of three percent over the rate established pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 3108

, or both, on the loan. The rules may provide for restrictions on representations by the lender regarding the disclosures required by the rules.

The Commissioner shall notify all mortgage lenders of the interest rate determined under

32 V.S.A. § 3108

annually.

The Commissioner may impose an administrative penalty of not more than $5,000.00 on any person that fails to comply with the provisions of this section. The Commissioner may order a lender to refund any discount points or other charges paid by a borrower who has not received disclosures required by the rule.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 98

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. April 16, 1998; amended

2015, No. 23

, § 89.